Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.601

Mental health services—Rules.

The director may adopt rules to implement RCW 41.05.600.

[ 2023 c 51 s 23; 2005 c 6 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—2005 c 6: See notes following RCW 41.05.600.